Massachusetts, session 194th, S1011.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after subsection A, paragraph (e) the following:-
(f) for re-housing, short-term housing transition program benefits, which shall be
available initially for 24 months and then in 12-month, renewable allotments, to eligible families.
The executive office shall provide further allotments of household assistance from the
Massachusetts short-term housing transition program to families that received household
assistance in a prior period to prevent eviction from existing housing or to relocate to another
housing situation in cases where a.) the family complied with their rehousing plan during the
prior period of assistance and b.) continues to include a child under the age of 21 or a pregnant
person.
The executive office shall not impose income eligibility restrictions on families once they
are enrolled in the program.
of 2

The executive office shall not require families to be evicted from their existing housing or
to otherwise establish that they fall into one of the four categories of affirmative eligibility for
emergency assistance shelter currently listed in item 7004-0101.
Families in summary process commenced for a reason determined by the executive office
to be a no fault or excused fault reason for eviction can apply and be found eligible for short-
term transition program benefits in order to prevent eviction from existing housing or permit the
family to relocate to another housing situation. The executive office shall allow families to apply
and be found eligible for this short-term housing benefit after the summons and complaint is
filed in court. Families shall be found eligible for short-term housing transition benefits if, but
for feasible alternative housing, they otherwise meet the eligibility requirements for family
shelter.
The executive office shall provide household assistance in an amount up to $50,000 in
the first 24-month period, or a higher cap as established in line item 7004-0108, and up to
$25,000, or higher cap as established in line item 7004-0108, in subsequent 12-month periods to
eligible families.
The executive office shall allow families to combine and maximize benefits under the
Massachusetts short-term housing transition program and residential assistance for families in
transition funds from line item 7004-9316 if families are eligible for both programs, such funds
are needed to promote housing stability, and the assistance is non-duplicative.
of 2